Washington statutes.
RCW 18.122.070

Advisory committees.

(1) The secretary has the authority to appoint advisory committees to further the purposes of this chapter. Each such committee shall be composed of five members, one member initially appointed for a term of one year, two for a term of two years, and two for a term of three years. Subsequent appointments shall be for terms of three years. No person may serve as a member of the committee for more than two consecutive terms. Members of an advisory committee shall be residents of this state. Each committee shall be composed of three individuals registered, certified, or licensed in the category designated, and two members who represent the public at large and are unaffiliated directly or indirectly with the profession being credentialed.

(2) The secretary may remove any member of the advisory committees for cause as specified by rule. In the case of a vacancy, the secretary shall appoint a person to serve for the remainder of the unexpired term.

(3) The advisory committees shall each meet at the times and places designated by the secretary and shall hold meetings during the year as necessary to provide advice to the director [secretary]. The committee may elect a chair and a vice chair. A majority of the members currently serving shall constitute a quorum.

(4) Each member of an advisory committee shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as authorized in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. In addition, members of the committees shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 when engaged in the authorized business of their committees.

(5) The secretary, members of advisory committees, or individuals acting on their behalf are immune from suit in any action, civil or criminal, based on any credentialing or disciplinary proceedings or other official acts performed in the course of their duties.

[ 1991 c 3 s 262; 1987 c 150 s 67.]